District of Columbia statutes.
24-106

Permitting expenditure of funds to carry out certain sewer agreement.

Notwithstanding the fourth sentence of § 1-204.46, the District of Columbia is authorized to obligate or expend such funds as may be necessary during a fiscal year (beginning with fiscal year 1997) to carry out the Sewage Delivery System and Capacity Purchase Agreement between Fairfax County and the District of Columbia with respect to Project Number K00301, without regard to the amount appropriated for such purpose in the budget of the District of Columbia for the fiscal year.

History

Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 740, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11206

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-1206.